District of Columbia statutes.
47-422

Repealed

Authority to make payments.

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-20, § 3, 24 DCR 3339
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(f), 48 DCR 334

Appropriations authorized: Section 111 of Pub. L. 104-194, 110 Stat. 2365, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that there are appropriated from the applicable funds of the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary for making payments authorized by this subchapter.

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”

1973 Ed., § 47-332.
1981 Ed., § 47-422.